North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 7C. Program Evaluation. [Repealed]

§ 120-36.11.
Program Evaluation Division established; definitions. [Repealed]

History.

2007-78, s. 3; 2018-101, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

§ 120-36.12.
Functions of Program Evaluation Division. [Repealed]

History.

2007-78, s. 3; 2008-196, s. 2(a); 2018-101, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-196, s. 2(a), effective August 8, 2008, added subdivision (10).

Session Laws 2018-101, s. 1, effective June 26, 2018, rewrote the section.

§ 120-36.13.
Biennial work plan for evaluations and measurability assessments. [Repealed]

History.

2007-78, s. 3; 2008-196, s. 1(a); 2012-80, s. 2; 2015-264, s. 68.5(a); 2018-101, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

§ 120-36.14.
Contents of an evaluation report by the Program Evaluation Division. [Repealed]

History.

2007-78, s. 3; 2015-264, s. 68.5(b); 2018-101, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

§ 120-36.15.
Joint Legislative Program Evaluation Oversight Committee established. [Repealed]

History.

2007-78, s. 3; 2018-101, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-101, s. 1, effective June 26, 2018, substituted “shall” for “must” throughout the section.

§ 120-36.16.
Powers and duties of Joint Legislative Program Evaluation Oversight Committee. [Repealed]

History.

2007-78, s. 3; 2007-484, s. 31; 2015-264, s. 68.5(c); 2018-101, s. 1; repealed by 2021-180, s. 27.2(a), effective July 1, 2021.

§ 120-36.17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-101, s. 1, effective June 26, 2018.

History.

2012-80, s. 1; 2015-264, s. 68.5(d); repealed by 2018-101, s. 1, effective June 26, 2018.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 68.5(d), effective October 1, 2015, substituted “work plan” for “annual work plan” in subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3).

§§ 120-36.18 through 120-36.20.

Reserved for future codification purposes.